en: Carburetor mounting flange type: 2-bolt flange; 3-bolt flange; 4-bolt flange; Slide-on clamp; Spigot mount (rubber boot); Threaded mount; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta prirubnice za montažu rasplinjača: Prirubnica s 2 vijka; Prirubnica s 3 vijka; Prirubnica s 4 vijka; Klizna stezaljka; Nasadni priključak (gumena manšeta); Navojni priključak; Ostalo
da: Karburatormonterings-flangetype: Flange med 2 bolte; Flange med 3 bolte; Flange med 4 bolte; Glidemonteret spændebånd; Studsmontering (gummimanchet); Gevindmontering; Andet
sk-SK: Typ upevňovacej príruby karburátora: Príruba na 2 skrutky; Príruba na 3 skrutky; Príruba na 4 skrutky; Násuvná svorka; Prírubová montáž (gumená manžeta); Závitová montáž; Iný
el: Τύπος φλάντζας στήριξης καρμπυρατέρ: Φλάντζα με 2 μπουλόνια; Φλάντζα με 3 μπουλόνια; Φλάντζα με 4 μπουλόνια; Συρταρωτός σφιγκτήρας; Βάση με κολάρο (ελαστική φούσκα); Βιδωτή βάση; Άλλο
es: Tipo de brida de montaje del carburador: Brida de 2 tornillos; Brida de 3 tornillos; Brida de 4 tornillos; Abrazadera deslizante; Montaje de espiga (fuelle de goma); Montaje roscado; Otro
hu: Karburátor rögzítőkarima típusa: 2 csavaros perem; 3 csavaros perem; 4 csavaros perem; Rácsúsztatható bilincs; Csapra szerelhető (gumiharang); Menetes rögzítésű; Egyéb
tr: Karbüratör montaj flanşı tipi: 2 cıvatalı flanş; 3 cıvatalı flanş; 4 cıvatalı flanş; Geçmeli kelepçe; Spigot montajı (kauçuk körük); Dişli montaj; Diğer
de: Art des Vergaser-Montageflansches: 2-Loch-Flansch; 3-Loch-Flansch; 4-Loch-Flansch; Klemmflansch; Stutzenbefestigung (Gummimanschette); Gewindeanschluss; Sonstige
sv: Förgasarens monteringsflänstyp: 2-bultad fläns; 3-bultad fläns; 4-bultad fläns; Påskjutbar klämma; Tappmontering (gummibälg); Gängad montering; Annat
nb: Forgassermonteringsflenstype: 2-bolts flens; 3-bolts flens; 4-bolts flens; Skyveklemme; Tappfeste (gummimansjett); Gjenget feste; Annet
cs: Typ montážní příruby karburátoru: Příruba se 2 šrouby; Příruba se 3 šrouby; Příruba se 4 šrouby; Násuvná svorka; Nátrubkové uchycení (gumová manžeta); Závitové upevnění; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul flanșei de montare a carburatorului: Flanșă cu 2 șuruburi; Flanșă cu 3 șuruburi; Flanșă cu 4 șuruburi; Clemă cu glisare; Montare pe manșon (burduf de cauciuc); Montare filetată; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de flange de montagem do carburador: Flange de 2 parafusos; Flange de 3 parafusos; Flange de 4 parafusos; Braçadeira de deslizar; Montagem tipo espigão (fole de borracha); Montagem de enroscar; Outro
bg-BG: Тип фланец за монтаж на карбуратора: Фланец с 2 болта; Фланец с 3 болта; Фланец с 4 болта; Напъхваща се скоба; Накрайник за гумен маншон; На винт; Друго
zh-CN: 化油器安装法兰类型: 2 螺栓法兰; 3 螺栓法兰; 4 螺栓法兰; 滑动夹箍; 承插口安装（橡胶套）; 螺纹安装; 其他
ko: 기화기 장착 플랜지형: 2볼트 플랜지; 3볼트 플랜지; 4볼트 플랜지; 슬라이드 온 클램프; 스피곳 마운트(고무 부트); 나사식 마운트; 기타
ru: Тип монтажного фланца карбюратора: Фланец на 2 болта; Фланец на 3 болта; Фланец на 4 болта; Надвижной хомут; Патрубок (резиновый чехол); Резьбовое крепление; Другое
it: Flangia di montaggio del carburatore tipo: Flangia a 2 bulloni; Flangia a 3 bulloni; Flangia a 4 bulloni; Morsetto a scorrimento; Attacco a innesto (cuffia in gomma); Attacco filettato; Altro
nl: Carburettor montageflens type: 2-bouts flens; 3-bouts flens; 4-bouts flens; Schuifklem; Spiebevestiging (rubberen hoes); Schroefbevestiging; Overige
vi: Loại mặt bích lắp đặt bộ chế hòa khí: Mặt bích 2 bu lông; Mặt bích 3 bu lông; Mặt bích 4 bu lông; Kẹp trượt; Ngàm ống lồng (chụp cao su); Ngàm ren; Khác
lt-LT: Karbiuratoriaus montavimo flanšo tipas: 2 varžtų flanšas; 3 varžtų flanšas; 4 varžtų flanšas; Užmaunamas spaustukas; Kaištinis tvirtinimas (guminė įvorė); Srieginis tvirtinimas; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de flange de montagem do carburador: Flange de 2 parafusos; Flange de 3 parafusos; Flange de 4 parafusos; Abraçadeira deslizante; Montagem em espigão (coifa de borracha); Montagem rosqueada; Outro
fr: Type de bride de montage du carburateur: Bride à 2 boulons; Bride à 3 boulons; Bride à 4 boulons; Collier de serrage à glisser; Montage à manchon (soufflet en caoutchouc); Montage fileté; Autre
sl-SI: Tip prirobnice za montažo uplinjača: Prirobnica z 2 vijakoma; Prirobnica s 3 vijaki; Prirobnica s 4 vijaki; Natična objemka; Čepna pritrditev (gumijasta manšeta); Navojna pritrditev; Drugo
ja: キャブレター取り付けフランジタイプ: 2ボルトフランジ; 3ボルトフランジ; 4ボルトフランジ; スライドオンクランプ; スピゴットマウント (ラバーブーツ); ネジ式マウント; その他
zh-TW: 化油器安裝法蘭類型: 2 螺栓法蘭; 3 螺栓法蘭; 4 螺栓法蘭; 滑動式夾具; 承口安裝 (橡膠套); 螺紋安裝; 其他
th: ประเภทหน้าแปลนยึดคาร์บูเรเตอร์: หน้าแปลน 2 รู; หน้าแปลน 3 รู; หน้าแปลน 4 รู; แคลมป์สวมเลื่อน; ยึดแบบหัวเสียบ (ยางหุ้ม); ยึดแบบเกลียว; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ kołnierza montażowego gaźnika: Kołnierz na 2 śruby; Kołnierz na 3 śruby; Kołnierz na 4 śruby; Obejma wsuwana; Mocowanie czopowe (osłona gumowa); Mocowanie gwintowane; Inne
fi: Kaasuttimen kiinnityslaipan tyyppi: 2-pulttinen laippa; 3-pulttinen laippa; 4-pulttinen laippa; Liukupuristin; Muhvikiinnitys (kumikaulus); Kierrekiinnitys; Muu